Illinois, session 104th, SB506.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Urban Weatherization Initiative Act is 5amended by changing Section 40-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 738/40-1)7    Sec. 40-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Urban Weatherization Initiative Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-37, eff. 7-13-09.)